Utah statutes.
49-23-202.   Participation of employers -- Admission requirements.

(1) (a)  An employer is a participating employer and may not withdraw from participation in this system.

(b)  A participating employer shall cover its:

(i)  public safety service employees in accordance with Section 49-15-202; and

(ii)  firefighter service employees in accordance with Section 49-16-202.

(2) (a)  An employer may, by resolution of its governing body, apply for admission to this system.

(b)  Upon approval of the resolution by the board, the employer is a participating employer in this system and is subject to this title.

(3)  If a participating employer purchases service credit on behalf of public safety service employees or firefighter service employees for service rendered prior to the participating employer's admission to this system, the service credit shall be purchased in a nondiscriminatory manner on behalf of all current and former public safety service employees or firefighter service employees who were eligible for service credit at the time service was rendered.

